Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1312.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1132.8 of Title 47, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. 1. Service Oklahoma, in coordination with the Oklahoma Tax


Commission, shall establish and administer the Automatic Vehicle


Registration Pre-Payment Program.


2. The program shall allow individuals who choose to


participate in such program to authorize:


a. monthly, quarterly, or annual automatic withdrawals


from a bank account, credit union account, or other


electronic payment method, and

Req. No. 3082 Page 1


b. the accumulation of prepaid funds to cover all fees,


taxes, and other payments due upon the renewal of


registration for a vehicle owned by such individual.


B. Prepaid funds received pursuant to the provisions of this


section shall be held in a designated clearing account administered


jointly by Service Oklahoma and the Oklahoma Tax Commission. Upon


the registration renewal date of a vehicle owned by the


participating individual, the prepaid funds deposited by the


participating individual shall be automatically applied to all


required fees, taxes, and other payments associated with such


renewal. Any balance of funds remaining after such application


shall remain to the credit of the participating individual, and


shall continue to accumulate for future registration renewal periods


unless such participating individual chooses otherwise.


C. 1. If a vehicle owned by a participating individual is


sold, traded, or otherwise transferred, the participating individual


shall choose to:


a. transfer the remaining prepaid balance to a different


vehicle owned by the same individual,


b. apply the remaining prepaid balance to any outstanding


motor vehicle taxes or fees owed by the same person,


or


c. request a refund of the unused prepaid amount, less


any processing fee established by rule.

Req. No. 3082 Page 2


2. Unless expressly authorized by both the buyer and seller on


a form prescribed by Service Oklahoma, no prepaid balance shall


remain attached to a vehicle upon sale, trade, or transfer to a new


owner.


3. Prepaid amounts shall not be deemed part of a vehicle’s


assessed or taxable value.


D. Service Oklahoma, in coordination with the Oklahoma Tax


Commission, shall:


1. Create electronic enrollment, withdrawal, and account


management systems;


2. Provide annual statements to participants showing amounts


deposited and applied;


3. Ensure consumer protections including fraud prevention,


privacy protection, opt-out procedures, and clear disclosure of


withdrawal schedules;


4. Establish methods for prorating or adjusting payments when


fees or tax rates change; and


5. Adopt procedures to reconcile and remit all applicable state


and local revenues in a timely manner.


E. Service Oklahoma and the Oklahoma Tax Commission shall


promulgate rules as necessary to implement the provisions of this


act. Such rules shall address:


1. Payment schedules;


2. Refund procedures;

Req. No. 3082 Page 3


3. Handling of insufficient-funds transactions;


4. System reporting requirements; and


5. Coordination with county assessors and county treasurers


where applicable.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-3082 MSBB 12/29/2025 12:42:01 PM



































Req. No. 3082 Page 4